North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06.2 Commercial Driver’s Licenses

39-06.2-01.
Uniform Commercial Driver’s License Act.

The purpose of this chapter is to implement the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 [title XII of Pub. L. 99-570, 49 U.S.C. 2701, repealed] and Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Act of 1999 [Pub. L. 106-159; 113 Stat. 1748; 49 U.S.C. 113 et seq.] and reduce or prevent commercial motor vehicle accidents, fatalities, and injuries by:

Permitting commercial drivers to hold only one license;

Disqualifying commercial drivers who have committed certain serious traffic violations or other specified offenses; and

Strengthening commercial driver’s licensing and testing standards.

This chapter is a remedial law which should be liberally construed to promote the public health, safety, and welfare. To the extent that this chapter conflicts with general driver’s licensing provisions, this chapter prevails. Where this chapter is silent, the general driver’s licensing provisions apply.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2001, ch. 344, § 1.

Note.

The federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, Title XII of Pub. L. 99-570, 49 USCS 2701, has been repealed, except for rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its repeal. For similar provisions, now see 49 USCS 31101 et seq.

39-06.2-02.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Alcohol” means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including ethanol, methanol, propanol, and isopropanol.

“Alcohol concentration” means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood;

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath; or

The number of grams of alcohol per sixty-seven milliliters of urine.

“Commercial learner’s permit” means a permit issued under subsection 4 of section 39-06.2-07.

“Commercial driver’s license” means a license issued under this chapter which authorizes an individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.

“Commercial driver’s license information system” means the information system established under the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.

“Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles designed or used to transport passengers or property:

If the gross combination weight rating or gross combination weight is twenty-six thousand one pounds [11793.86 kilograms] or more, whichever is greater, provided the towed unit has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than ten thousand pounds [4536 kilograms], whichever is greater;

If the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms], whichever is greater;

If the vehicle is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver; or

If the vehicle is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 CFR part 172, subpart F or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 CFR part 73.

“Controlled substance” means any substance so classified under section 802(6) of the Controlled Substances Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)], and includes all substances listed on schedules I through V, of 21 CFR part 1308, as they may be revised from time to time.

“Conviction” means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination that an individual has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the individual’s appearance in court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.

“Covered farm vehicle” means a straight truck or articulated vehicle:

Registered in a state with a licensed plate or other designation issued by the state of registration which allows law enforcement officials to identify it as a farm vehicle;

Operated by the owner or operator of a farm or ranch or an employee or family member of an owner or operator of a farm or ranch;

Used to transport agricultural commodities, livestock, machinery, or supplies to or from a farm or ranch; and

Not used in for-hire motor carrier operations; however, for-hire motor carrier operations do not include the operation of a vehicle meeting the requirements of subdivisions a, b, and c of this subsection by a tenant pursuant to a crop share farm lease agreement to transport the landlord’s portion of the crops under that agreement.

Meeting the requirements of subdivisions a, b, c, and d of this subsection:

With a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is greater, of twenty-six thousand one pounds [11793.86 kilograms] or less may utilize the exemptions in 40 CFR 390.39 anywhere in the United States; or

With a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is greater, or more than twenty-six thousand one pounds [11793.86 kilograms] may utilize the exemptions in 40 CFR 390.39 anywhere in the state of registration or across the state lines within one hundred fifty air miles of the farm or ranch with respect to which the vehicle is being operated.

“Disqualification” means a withdrawal of the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

“Downgrade” means:

A state allows the driver to change the driver’s self-certification to interstate, but operating exclusively in transportation or operation excepted from 49 CFR part 391, as provided in 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3;

A state allows the driver to change the driver’s self-certification to intrastate only, if the driver qualifies under the state’s physical qualification requirements for intrastate only;

A state allows the driver to change the driver’s certification to intrastate, but operating exclusively in transportation or operations excepted from all or part of the state driver’s qualification; or

A state removes the commercial driver’s license privilege from the driver’s license.

“Drive” means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of a motor vehicle.

“Driver” means an individual who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle, or who is required to hold a commercial driver’s license.

“Driver’s license” means a license issued by a state to an individual which authorizes the individual to drive a motor vehicle.

“Drug” means any drug or substance or combination of drugs or substances which renders an individual incapable of safely driving, and includes any controlled substance.

“Electronic device” includes a cellular telephone, personal digital assistant, pager, computer, or any other device used to input, write, send, receive, or read text.

“Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle, or assigns an individual to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

“Fatality” means the death of an individual as a result of a motor vehicle accident.

“Felony” means any offense under state or federal law which is punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.

“Foreign commercial driver” means an individual licensed to operate a commercial motor vehicle by an authority outside the United States or a citizen of a foreign country who operates a commercial motor vehicle in the United States.

“Foreign jurisdiction” means any jurisdiction other than a state of the United States.

“Gross vehicle weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single or a combination or articulated vehicle. The gross vehicle weight rating of a combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to as the “gross combination weight rating”, is the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit plus the gross vehicle weight rating or actual weight of the towed unit or units.

“Hazardous materials” means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 CFR part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 CFR part 73.

“Imminent hazard” means the existence of a condition of vehicle, employee, or commercial motor vehicle operations which substantially increases the likelihood of serious injury or death if not discontinued immediately or a condition relating to hazardous materials which presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment.

“Mobile telephone” means a mobile communication device that falls under or uses any commercial mobile radio service, as defined in regulations of the federal communications commission in 47 CFR 20.3. The term does not include two-way and citizens band radio services.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled, and every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails, except vehicles moved solely by human power and motorized wheelchairs.

“Noncommercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles not defined by the term commercial motor vehicle.

“Nondomiciled commercial driver’s license” means a commercial driver’s license or a commercial learner’s permit issued by a state to an individual domiciled in a foreign country meeting the requirements of 49 CFR 383.23(b)(1).

“Out-of-service order” means a temporary prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle.

“Serious traffic violation” means a conviction when operating a commercial motor vehicle of:

Excessive speeding, involving a single charge of any speed fifteen miles [24.14 kilometers] per hour or more, above the posted speed limit;

Reckless driving, as defined under section 39-08-03 or local ordinance, including charges of driving a commercial motor vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of an individual or property, improper or erratic traffic lane changes, or following the vehicle ahead too closely;

A violation of any state or local law related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with a fatal accident;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit in the driver’s possession. An individual who provides proof to the enforcement authority that issued the citation, by the date the individual must appear in court or pay a fine for such violation, that the individual held a valid commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of this offense;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of commercial driver’s license, endorsement, or commercial learner’s permit, for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported;

Violating a state or local law or ordinance prohibiting texting while driving; or

Violating a state law or local law or ordinance on motor vehicle traffic control restricting or prohibiting the use of a hand-held mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

“State” means a state of the United States or the District of Columbia.

“Tank vehicle” means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous material within one or more tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred nineteen gallons [450.46 liters] and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand gallons [3785.41 liters] or more that is either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank, not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of one thousand gallons [3785.41 liters] or more that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer is not considered a tank vehicle.

“Texting” means manually entering alphanumeric text into, or reading text from, an electronic device. This action includes short message service, electronic mail, instant messaging, a command or request to access a worldwide web page, pressing more than a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone or engaging in any other form of electronic text retrieval or entry, for present or future communication. “Texting” does not include:

Pressing a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone;

Inputting, selecting, or reading information on a global positioning system or navigation system; or

Using a device capable of performing multiple functions, including fleet management systems, dispatching devices, smartphones, citizens’ band radios, or music players, for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited in 49 CFR part 383.

“Third-party skills test examiner” means an individual employed by a third-party tester who is authorized by the state to administer the skills tests in 49 CFR part 383, subparts G and H.

“Third-party tester” means a person, including another state, a motor carrier, a private driver training facility or other private institution, or a political subdivision authorized by the state to employ skills test examiners to administer the skills tests in 49 CFR part 383, subparts G and H.

“United States” means the fifty states and the District of Columbia.

“Use a hand-held mobile telephone” means using at least one hand to hold a mobile telephone to conduct a voice communication; dialing or answering a mobile telephone by pressing more than a single button; or reaching for a mobile telephone in a manner that requires a driver to maneuver so that the driver is no longer in a seated driving position, restrained by a seatbelt that is installed under 49 CFR 393.93 and adjusted in accordance with the vehicle manufacturer’s instructions.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 1997, ch. 332, § 9; 2003, ch. 312, § 4; 2003, ch. 322, § 4; 2005, ch. 329, § 5; 2009, ch. 334, § 1; 2011, ch. 278, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 298, § 2; 2015, ch. 265, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 265, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-06.2-03.
Limitation on number of driver’s licenses.

No person who drives a commercial motor vehicle may have more than one driver’s license.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06.2-04.
Notification required by driver.

Notification of convictions.

To state: Any driver holding a commercial driver’s license issued by this state who is convicted of violating any state or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in any other state or any federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal law of Canada, other than parking violations, must notify the director in the manner specified by the director within thirty days of the date of conviction.

To employers: Any driver holding a commercial driver’s license issued by this state who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or any other state or any federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal law of Canada, other than parking violations, must notify the driver’s employer in writing of the conviction within thirty days of the date of conviction.

Notification of suspensions, revocations, and cancellations. Any driver whose commercial driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state, or who loses the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period, including being disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or who is subject to an out-of-service order, must notify the employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of that fact.

Notification of previous employment. Any person who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver must provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the ten years preceding the date of application:

A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

The dates between which the applicant drove for each employer; and

The reason for leaving that employer.

The applicant must certify that all information furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to provide additional information.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 1993, ch. 383, § 2.

39-06.2-05.
Employer responsibilities.

Each employer shall require the applicant to provide the information specified in section 39-06.2-04.

No employer may knowingly allow, permit, or authorize a driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle during any period:

In which the driver’s commercial driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state or in which the driver is currently disqualified from driving a commercial vehicle or subject to an out-of-service order in any state; or

In which the driver has more than one driver’s license.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06.2-06.
Commercial driver’s license required.

Except when driving under a commercial learner’s permit and accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the vehicle being driven, an individual may not drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the individual holds and is in immediate possession of a commercial driver’s license with applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle the individual is driving. This subsection does not apply:

When the vehicle being driven is a house car or a vehicle towing a travel trailer being used solely for personal rather than commercial purposes.

When the vehicle being driven constitutes emergency or firefighting equipment necessary to the preservation of life or property.

When the vehicle is being driven for military purposes, subject to any limitations imposed by 49 CFR part 383.3(c).

When the vehicle being driven is a covered farm vehicle as defined in this chapter.

No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state while the person’s driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while subject to a disqualification.

The provisions of this chapter are waived, as to farm-to-market operations by farmers, but limited to those operators of a farm vehicle that is:

Controlled and operated by a farmer.

Used to transport either agricultural products, including trees, farm machines, farm supplies, or both, to or from a farm.

Not used in the operations of a common or contract carrier.

Used within one hundred fifty miles [241.40 kilometers] of the person’s farm.

The provisions of this chapter are waived as to an individual employed by and operating a vehicle at the request of and within a political subdivision, with a population of less than three thousand, during an emergency declared by that political subdivision for the removal of snow and ice. This waiver only applies when the regularly employed driver is unavailable or the employing political subdivision determines that additional assistance is required.

Pursuant to the limitations imposed by 49 CFR part 383.3, the required knowledge and skills tests may be waived and a restricted commercial driver’s license issued for a single period of one hundred eighty days or two periods of ninety days within a twelve-month period to employees of agrichemical businesses, custom harvesters, farm retail outlets and suppliers, including retailers and suppliers of trees, and livestock feeders.

Pursuant to the limitations imposed by 49 Code of Federal Regulations part 383.3, the holder of a class A commercial driver’s license is exempt from the hazardous materials endorsement, if the licenseholder is:

Acting within the scope of the licenseholder’s employment, and within the state of domicile, or another state with a hazardous materials enforcement exemption, as an employee of a custom harvester operation, agrichemical business, farm retail outlet and supplier, or livestock feeder; and

Operating a service vehicle that is transporting diesel in a quantity of one thousand gallons [3785 liters] or less which is clearly marked with “flammable” or “combustible” placard, as appropriate.

In accordance with title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 384, section 230, the department may not issue a commercial driver’s license to an individual who obtains a commercial learner’s permit unless the individual complies with title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 380, subpart F.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2001, ch. 345, § 1; 2003, ch. 312, § 5; 2007, ch. 326, § 1; 2007, ch. 327, § 1; 2013, ch. 298, § 3; 2013, ch. 299, § 1; 2015, ch. 265, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 267, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2019, ch. 320, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 265, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-06.2-07.
Commercial driver’s license qualification standards.

An individual may not be issued a commercial driver’s license unless that individual is a resident of this state; has passed a knowledge and skills test that may include a skills test or knowledge test administered by another state or skills test or knowledge test results electronically submitted by another state, for driving a commercial motor vehicle which complies with minimum federal standards established by federal regulations enumerated in 49 CFR part 383, subparts G and H; and has satisfied all other requirements of state and federal law, including the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act. The tests must be prescribed and conducted by the director. The applicant shall pay the fee listed in section 39-06.2-19 for each of the tests.

The director may authorize third-party testing, if:

The test is the same as that which would otherwise be administered by this state; and

The third party has entered an agreement with this state which complies with requirements of 49 CFR part 383.75.

The director may waive the skills test specified in this section for a commercial driver’s license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 CFR part 383.77.

A commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit may not be issued to an individual while the individual is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle or while the individual’s driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or canceled in any state. A commercial driver’s license may not be issued to an individual who has a commercial driver’s license issued by any other state unless the individual first surrenders all licenses from other states. The director shall notify the issuing state of the surrender of the license.

An individual who has been a resident of this state for thirty days may not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction.

A commercial learner’s permit may be issued to an individual who holds a valid class D operator’s license who has passed the vision and written tests required for an equivalent commercial driver’s license.

The commercial learner’s permit may not be issued for a period to exceed one year. After this initial period, the director may issue a letter of authority that authorizes the applicant to drive to a driver’s license office, complete the road test, and return home, or the individual may retake the knowledge test and be issued another commercial learner’s permit valid for one year. The holder of a permit, unless otherwise disqualified, may drive a commercial motor vehicle only when accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the type of vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle. A holder of a permit is not eligible for a license until that individual has had the permit issued for at least fourteen days.

A commercial learner’s permitholder may not operate a commercial motor vehicle:

Transporting passengers requiring a passenger endorsement;

Transporting passengers requiring a schoolbus endorsement;

Requiring a tank vehicle endorsement unless the tank is empty and does not contain residue of hazardous materials; or

Transporting hazardous materials, regardless of need for hazardous materials endorsement.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2011, ch. 278, § 4; 2013, ch. 298, § 4; 2013, ch. 300, § 1; 2015, ch. 266, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 320, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 321, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 280, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 266, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-06.2-07 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 320, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1098; and Section 1 of Chapter 321, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2121.

39-06.2-08.
Application for commercial driver’s license.

The application for a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit must include the following:

The full name and current residence and mailing address of the applicant;

A physical description of the applicant, including sex, height, weight, and eye and hair color;

Date of birth;

The applicant’s social security number, unless the application is for a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license and the applicant is a resident of a foreign jurisdiction;

The applicant’s signature;

The certifications including those required by 49 CFR part 383.71;

Any other information required by the director; and

A consent to release driving record information.

The application must be accompanied by an application fee listed in section 39-06.2-19. The application must contain any other information as the director may require to improve identity security. The director shall require an applicant for a commercial license or commercial learner’s permit to provide documentary evidence that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity, date of birth, and legal presence of the applicant and provide a social security card or other satisfactory evidence of a social security number and proof of residence address, if not previously provided or if there are changes to the information already on file.

When the holder of a commercial driver’s license changes the holder’s name or residence address, an application for a substitute license must be made under section 39-06-18.

Any individual who knowingly falsifies information or certifications required under subsection 1 is subject to suspension, revocation, cancellation, or disqualification of the individual’s commercial driver’s license or pending application for a period of at least sixty consecutive days.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2009, ch. 329, § 5; 2009, ch. 334, § 2; 2011, ch. 278, § 5; 2013, ch. 298, § 5; 2013, ch. 300, § 2; 2017, ch. 256, § 9, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06.2-08.1.
Commercial driver’s license medical certification requirements.

The director may issue a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license to a North Dakota resident who meets the medical qualification and certification requirements pursuant to the limitations of 49 CFR parts 383 and 391.

Every individual who makes application for a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license shall certify that the individual meets the qualification requirements contained in 49 CFR part 391 or certify that the individual’s commercial transportation is entirely in intrastate commerce and is not subject to 49 CFR part 391.

The application will contain the following categories to comply with the commercial driver’s certification requirements:

Interstate and subject to 49 CFR part 391.

Interstate, but operating exclusively in transportation or operations excepted under 49 CFR part 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3.

Intrastate and subject to state driver’s qualification requirements.

Intrastate, but operating exclusively in transportation or operations excepted from all or part of the state driver’s qualification requirements.

Every individual who makes application for or holds a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license shall submit a copy of the individual’s medical certificate to the director unless the commercial transportation is not subject to 49 CFR part 391.

The director will downgrade or remove the commercial driving privilege from the license if the medical certificate expires and the driver does not change the driver’s certification if the driver is no longer subject to 49 CFR part 391.

If the driver provides a current medical certification, the director shall upgrade without retesting the license of a driver which was downgraded under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 278, § 3; 2013, ch. 298, § 6.

39-06.2-09.
Commercial driver’s license.

The commercial driver’s license must be marked “commercial driver’s license”, and must be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof. The license must include the following information:

The name and residential address of the individual;

The individual’s color photograph;

A physical description of the individual, including sex, height, and eye color;

Date of birth;

A distinguishing number assigned to the individual;

The individual’s signature;

The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles which the individual is authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions;

The name of this state; and

The dates between which the license is valid.

The director may issue a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license under the limitations of 49 CFR 383 including waiving the social security number requirement. The face of the license must be marked “nondomiciled” in accordance with 49 CFR 383.153(c).

Commercial driver’s licenses may be issued with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions. The holder of a valid commercial driver’s license may drive all vehicles in the class for which that license is issued and all lesser classes of vehicles except motorcycles. Vehicles for which an endorsement is required may not be driven unless the proper endorsement appears on the license. The requirements of placarding vehicles transporting hazardous materials under subparagraph b of paragraph 3 of subdivision a and the endorsement required under paragraph 1 of subdivision b do not apply to the operator of a farm vehicle if the vehicle is controlled and operated by a farmer and used to transport hazardous materials in the form of farm supplies within one hundred fifty miles [241.40 kilometers] of the farm and is not used in the operations of a common or contract carrier.

The classifications of commercial driver’s licenses are:

A class A license. This license allows the operation of any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms], if the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicles being towed is in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms].

A class B license. This license allows the operation of a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms], and this vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms].

A class C license. This license allows the operation of a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] or less or this vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms] comprising:

Vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver; and

Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 CFR part 172, subpart F.

Endorsements and restrictions include:

“H” that authorizes the driver to drive a vehicle transporting hazardous materials.

“T” that authorizes driving double and triple trailers.

“P” that authorizes driving vehicles carrying passengers.

“N” that authorizes driving tank vehicles.

“X” that authorizes driving combinations of tank vehicles and hazardous material vehicles.

“S” that authorizes driving a schoolbus.

Other restrictions may be placed upon a commercial driver’s license, under section 39-06-17. The applicant shall pay a fee listed in section 39-06.2-19 for each endorsement.

Before issuing a commercial driver’s license, the director shall obtain driving record information through the commercial driver’s license information system, the national driver’s register, and from each state in which the individual has been licensed.

Within ten days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the director shall notify the commercial driver’s license information system of that fact, providing all information required to ensure identification of the individual.

A commercial driver’s license issued under this chapter expires in the manner provided for operator’s licenses under section 39-06-19.

An individual applying for renewal of a commercial driver’s license must complete the application form required by subsection 1 of section 39-06.2-08, and provide updated information and required certifications. For an applicant to retain a hazardous materials endorsement, the applicant must take and pass the written test for a hazardous materials endorsement.

A class A, B, or C license may not be issued to an individual under eighteen years of age, except a class A, B, or C type license specially restricted to use for custom harvest purposes must be issued to an individual at least sixteen years of age who satisfactorily completes the appropriate examinations.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 461, § 4; 2001, ch. 37, § 6; 2001, ch. 344, § 2; 2009, ch. 328, § 3; 2009, ch. 334, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 60, ch. 298, § 7; 2013, ch. 300, § 3; 2013.

39-06.2-09.1.
Nondomiciled commercial license.

The department may issue a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license to an applicant who does not present a social security card as required by section 39-06.2-08 but who otherwise meets the requirements for a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license. A license issued under this subsection is valid only during the period of time of the applicant’s authorized stay in the United States. The license may be renewed only upon presentation of valid documentary evidence that the status has been extended. The department shall renew without a skills or knowledge test a nondomiciled commercial license that has been expired for a duration not longer than one year.

The fee for a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license is listed in section 39-06.2-19.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 334, § 4; 2013, ch. 298, § 8; 2013, ch. 300, § 4.